Hawaii statutes.
§414D-105 Notice of meeting. (a) A
corporation shall give notice consistent with its bylaws of meetings of members
in a fair and reasonable manner.

(b) Any notice that conforms to the
requirements of subsection (c) is fair and reasonable, but other means of
giving notice may also be fair and reasonable when all the circumstances are
considered; provided that notice of matters referred to in subsection (c)(2)
shall be given as provided in subsection (c).

(c) Notice shall be fair and reasonable if:

(1) The corporation notifies its members of the
place, date, and time of each annual, regular, and special meeting of members
no fewer than ten or more than sixty days before the meeting date;

(2) Notice of an annual or regular meeting includes a
description of any matter or matters that must be approved by the members under
sections 414D-150, 414D-164, 414D-182, 414D-202, 414D-222, 414D-241, and
414D-242; and

(3) Notice of a special meeting includes a
description of the matter or matters for which the meeting is called.

(d) Unless the bylaws require otherwise, if an
annual, regular, or special meeting of members is adjourned to a different
date, time, or place, notice need not be given of the new date, time, or place,
if the new date, time, or place is announced at the meeting before
adjournment. If a new record date for the adjourned meeting is or must be
fixed under section 414D-107, however, notice of the adjourned meeting shall be
given under this section to the members of record as of the new record date. [L
2001, c 105, pt of §1; am L 2002, c 130, §46]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next